Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 11 Administration
§ 39-11-105.
Exemptions.

The following property is exempt from property taxation:

Property owned by the United States the majority of which is used primarily for a governmental purpose. The following property is not owned and used primarily for a governmental purpose:

Improvements placed on federal lands by persons for private or commercial use;

Improvements furnished by the federal government to employees other than enlisted and officer personnel of the armed forces as a place of residence;

Improvements and equipment rented, leased, loaned or furnished by the federal government to employees or groups of employees for the purpose of operating enterprises for which there is a service or admission charge;

The equity or interest of the purchaser, his heirs, executors or assigns, in any real property being purchased from the United States government under a contract of sale, the value thereof to be determined by taking the market value of the real property and deducting the amount of principal and accrued interest owing to the United States on January 1 of the year for which the property is assessed;

Lands entered under any act of congress when final proof of ownership has been issued before February 1 whether or not patent for the lands has been issued.

Property of the state of Wyoming owned and used primarily for a governmental purpose. The following property is not owned and used primarily for a governmental purpose:

Improvements placed on state lands by lessees for private or commercial use;

Improvements furnished by the state to employees as a place of residence;

Improvements and equipment rented, leased, loaned or furnished by the state to employees or groups of employees for the purpose of operating enterprises for which there is a service or admission charge;

The equity or interest of the purchaser, his heirs, executors or assigns, in any land being purchased from the state of Wyoming under a contract of sale, the value thereof to be determined by taking the market value of the lands and deducting the amount of principal and accrued interest owing to the state of Wyoming on January 1 of the year for which the property is assessed.

Property owned and used by counties primarily for a governmental purpose;

Property of a Wyoming school district owned and used primarily for a governmental purpose excluding teacherages;

Property of Wyoming cities and towns owned and used primarily for a governmental purpose including:

Streets and alleys and property used for the construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair of streets and alleys;

Property used to furnish sewer and water services;

City or town halls, police stations and equipment, traffic control equipment, garbage collection and disposal equipment and lands and buildings used to service and repair the halls, stations or equipment;

Parks, airports, auditoriums, cemeteries, golf courses, playgrounds and recreational facilities. Any charges for the use of the facilities shall not exceed the cost of operation and maintenance to qualify for the exemption;

Personal property used exclusively for the care, preservation and administration of city or town property;

Parking lots operated on a nonprofit basis.

Property of a public library used for library purposes;

Real property used:

Exclusively for religious worship, church schools and church parsonages; or

For religious education camps which are used exclusively for religious educational training, associated fellowship activities or worship and are not used for private profit nor for commercial purposes.

Property of a cemetery used for cemetery purposes;

Property of:

A nonprofit organization, corporation, cooperative or association which is exclusively a water utility engaged in the production, gathering, transmission, distribution or sale of water for domestic use in Wyoming; and

Any other organization, corporation, cooperative or association which is a water utility, if the property is used in the production, gathering, transmission, distribution or sale of water for domestic use in Wyoming.

Fire engines, stations, including land upon which located, and equipment used to extinguish fires;

Personal property held for personal or family use excluding mobile homes required to be titled under W.S.

31-2-501

through

31-2-508

;

Inventories;

Vehicles subject to registration as defined by W.S. 31-4-101(a)(i) and 31-18-201(a) and registered as provided by law;

Vehicles owned by the United States, state of Wyoming, counties, cities, towns, school districts and municipal corporations when used primarily for a governmental purpose;

Snowmobiles;

Property of a museum or hospital district;

In transit property;

Property owned by the Wyoming community development authority excluding assessments for local improvements;

Property of charitable trusts, the purpose of which conforms to W.S. 4-10-406(a) and which is directly beneficial to the people of this state;

Property used for pollution control to the extent provided by W.S.

35-11-1103

;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207.

Property owned by a water and sewer district;

Property of a water conservancy district;

The property of veterans to the extent provided by W.S.

39-13-105

;

Property used for schools, museums, orphan asylums or hospitals to the extent they are not used for private profit. As used in this paragraph, “museum” means as defined in W.S. 34-23-101(a)(iv);

Property owned and used by a secret and benevolent society or association which is directly beneficial to the people of this state to the extent it is not used for private profit nor primarily for commercial purposes by the society, association or lessee thereof;

Property owned by a nonprofit society, foundation or association and used primarily as a community area center in which presentations in music, the arts and related fields are made in order to foster public interest and education therein, to the extent and in the proportion that receipts and revenues attributable to the above specified presentations bear to total receipts and revenues from the use and operation of the center including rentals and revenues received for the commercial use of the center not attributable to the above specified presentations;

Lands for mines or mining claims as prescribed by section 3, article 15, Wyoming constitution and defined by W.S.

39-11-102

(c)(viii);

Intangible personal property as provided by subsection (b) of this section, and except as specified in W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xi);

Other property as provided by law;

All livestock including livestock in feed lots being fed for slaughter. This exemption applies only to ad valorem taxation. Any other special tax which is levied on livestock for a particular purpose based on the assessment value established by the department of revenue is not affected by this exemption;

Any improvement to residential property making entrance to or common facilities within the property accessible to a handicapped person;

Real and personal property owned by an irrigation district created under W.S.

41-7-201

through

41-7-210

or a weed and pest control district created under W.S.

11-5-101

et seq. which is essential to the operation and maintenance of the district and which is used for no business or commercial activity unrelated to the operation and maintenance of the district;

Mobile machinery registered under W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

;

Property owned and used by a nonprofit corporation serving persons with disabilities, mental illnesses or substance abuse problems, or operating a family violence project to the extent it is not used for private profit nor primarily for commercial purposes;

Real property owned by the Wyoming game and fish commission. Nothing in this exemption affects the special tax levied under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xii);

Property owned by a conservation district formed pursuant to the Wyoming Conservation Districts Law, W.S.

11-16-101

through

11-16-134

;

Any improvements and land amenities, including but not limited to streets, curbs, gutters, utilities, sewer or water infrastructure that may contribute to the value of the land, on real property owned by a community development organization. The amount of the exemption shall be reported by the county assessor on the abstract submitted to the state board of equalization as prescribed by W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c)(ii). This exemption shall cease to apply to improvements and land amenities on real property from and after the date the real property is sold or leased by the community development organization. As used in this paragraph, “community development organization” means a group of private citizens organized as a business entity authorized to do business in this state for the purpose of working with new, existing or expanding business for the creation of new jobs, capital investment and other economic or community development benefits throughout its community or county, which organization is authorized as a nonprofit commercially oriented organization under 26 U.S.C. section 501(c)(3) or (6). In addition, the executive head of the community development association shall certify under oath to the assessor that:

The organization has no private stock and does not distribute profit to its owners or members;

The organization utilizes the real property subject to this paragraph to attract new businesses to the community for the purpose of creating new jobs, capital investment and economic development;

Each of the organization’s officers, directors and employees has agreed in writing that proprietary information, confidential information and any other information which has not been publicly released shall not be used in any way for business, personal or family gain; and

The lease, sale or other transfer of the real property subject to this paragraph is open to potential prospects of the community development organization which will further the purposes specified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph and is not limited to the members of the organization.

Property owned and used by any fraternal organization officially recognized by the University of Wyoming or any Wyoming community college to the extent it is not used for private profit nor primarily for commercial purposes by the organization;

Property owned and used by any senior citizens center to the extent it is not used for private profit nor primarily for commercial purposes by the center;

Property owned and used by a charitable society or association, if the property is not for investment purposes but rather the property is used directly for the operation of the charity and which is directly beneficial to the people of this state;

If a person owns two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400.00) or less in fair market value of business property in one (1) county, the business property shall be exempt as de minimis business property. As used in this paragraph, “business property” means taxable personal property excluding any property that is exempt under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xi) as personal property held for personal or family use.

The following shall be exempt from property taxation:

Goodwill if established and separately identified on a company’s books and records, or affirmed by generally accepted accounting, or appraisal, principles;

Any of the following intangible items:

Workforce in place including its composition and terms and condition, contractual or otherwise, of its employment;

Business books and records, operating systems or any other information base including lists or other information with respect to current or prospective customers;

Any patent, copyright, formula, process, design, pattern, know-how, format, proprietary computer software or other similar items;

Any customer-based intangible. As used in this subparagraph, “customer-based intangible” means composition of market, market share and any other value resulting from future provision of goods or services pursuant to relationships, contractual or otherwise, in the ordinary course of business with customers. In the case of a financial institution, “customer-based intangible” includes deposit base and similar items;

Any supplier-based intangible. As used in this subparagraph, “supplier-based intangible” means any value resulting from future acquisitions of goods or services pursuant to relationships, contractual or otherwise, in the ordinary course of business with suppliers of goods or services to be used or sold by the taxpayer.

Any license, permit or other right granted by a person, or by a governmental unit or an agency or instrumentality thereof;

Any covenant not to compete, or other arrangement to the extent such arrangement has substantially the same effect as a covenant not to compete, entered into in connection with an acquisition directly or indirectly of an interest in a trade or business or substantial portion thereof;

Any franchise, trademark or trade name;

Any of the following intangible items:

Money and cash on hand including currency, gold, silver and other coin, specie and specie legal tender as provided in W.S.

9-4-1304

, bank drafts, certified checks, cashier’s checks and virtual currencies. As used in this subparagraph, “virtual currency” means any type of digital representation of value that:

Is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account or store of value; and

Is not recognized as legal tender by the United States government.

Money on deposit;

Accounts receivable and other credits;

Bonds, promissory notes, debentures and other evidences of debt;

Shares of stock or other written evidence of ownership;

Judgments for the payment of money;

Annuities and annuity contracts.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 43, § 1, 2004, ch. 15, § 1; 2006, ch. 31, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 207; 2010, ch. 100, § 1; 2011, ch. 44, § 1; 2014 ch. 78, § 1, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 126, § 1, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 45, § 1, effective March 10, 2018; 2018 ch. 87, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 158, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, added (a)(xxxviii).

The 2006 amendment,

effective January 1, 2007,
inserted “as provided by W.S. 39-13-105(j), and” in (a)(xxix).

The 2007 amendment,

in (a) substituted “subsection (b) of this section” for “W.S. 39-13-105(j)”; and added (b).

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(xxi), which read: “Property owned by the Black Hills Joint Power Commission.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective January 1, 2011, added (a)(xxxviii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xxv), inserted “museums,” and added the second sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective January 1, 2015, in (a)(xix), added “the purpose of which conforms to W.S. 4-10-406(a) and which is directly beneficial to the people of this state”; in (a)(xxvi), substituted “owned and used by a secret and benevolent” for “used by a secret, benevolent and charitable,” substituted “which is directly beneficial to the people of this state” for “including any fraternal organization officially recognized by the University of Wyoming or any community college, and senior citizens centers,” deleted “or center” preceding “or leesee thereof”; and added (a)(xxxix) through (a)(xli).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, added the (a)(vii)(A) designation; added (a)(vii)(B); and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018
amendment, by ch. 45, § 1, in (b)(vi)(A), added “and
virtual
currencies. As used in this subparagraph, “virtual
currency”
means any type of digital representation of value
that” at
the end; added (b)(vi)(A)(I) and (II), and made a
stylistic change.

Laws 2018,
ch. 45, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 87, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(vi)(A),
inserted “specie and specie legal tender as provided in W.S.

9-4-1304

.”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment

, effective January 1, 2022, added (a)(xlii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 43, § 1, amended W.S.

39-1-201

, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment by ch. 43 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2006, ch. 30, § 1, provides:

“(a)

For the tax year 2006, the department of revenue shall exempt from property taxation the contributory fair market value of all intangible personal property attributable to Wyoming when the intangible personal property is separately identified on the taxpayer's or parent company's:

“(i)

Books and records;

“(ii)

Reports filed with any state or federal regulatory agency;

“(iii)

Federal income tax returns; or

“(iv)

Other documentation as accepted by the department.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

I. General Consideration.

II. Specific Types of Property.

III. Procedure.

§ 39-11-106.
Licenses; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-11-107.
Compliance; collection procedures.

There are no specific applicable provisions for compliance and collection procedures for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-11-108.
Enforcement.

There are no specific applicable provisions for enforcement for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-11-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this chapter.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department may appeal to the board. Appeals shall be made in a timely manner as provided by rules and regulations of the board by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds therefor. The department shall, within a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations, transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken;

Any person including the state of Wyoming aggrieved by any order issued by the board, or any county board of equalization whose decision has been reversed or modified by the state board of equalization, may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the property or some part thereof is situated;

Any interested person adversely affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a) shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing before the board;

In any appeal to the board authorized by this section, the taxpayer may present any credible evidence, including expert opinion testimony, to rebut the presumption in favor of a valuation asserted by the department. The board shall make specific findings and conclusions as to the evidence presented.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

As used in this subsection:

“Department” means the department of health;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 110, § 2.

“Income” includes, but is not limited to, wages, receipts from earnings including earnings from self-employment, rents, interest, dividends, annuities, trusts, pensions, alimony, support payments, public assistance payments, unemployment compensation, federal social security payments, veteran’s benefits and disability payments, native American per capita payments, or net income from any other qualified income as determined by the department;

“Resident” means a person who has been a resident of Wyoming and domiciled within Wyoming for a period of not less than one (1) year and who has not claimed residency elsewhere for any purpose for the one (1) year period immediately preceding the date of application for a refund under this subsection;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 110, § 2.

“Totally disabled” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older whose physical or mental condition permanently prevents the person from performing any substantial gainful employment during the one (1) year period immediately preceding the date of application for a refund under this subsection.

Wyoming residents meeting asset eligibility requirements under paragraph (vii) of this subsection who are sixty-five (65) years of age and older or who are eighteen (18) years of age and older and are totally disabled during the one (1) year period immediately preceding the date of application for a refund under this subsection and are not residents of any state funded institution, are qualified for an exemption and refund of state taxes as provided in this subsection. The application shall indicate whether the applicant has applied for or received any refund under this section, a property tax exemption under W.S.

39-13-105

, a property tax refund under W.S. 39-13-109(c)(v) or a property tax credit under W.S. 39-13-109(d) for the same calendar year. Subject to legislative appropriation for the program, a qualified single person whose actual income is less than seventeen thousand five hundred dollars ($17,500.00) shall receive eight hundred dollars ($800.00) reduced by the percentage that his actual income exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) per year and qualified married persons, at least one (1) of whom is at least sixty-five (65) years of age or totally disabled, whose actual income is less than twenty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($28,500.00) shall receive nine hundred dollars ($900.00) reduced by the percentage that their actual income exceeds sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000.00) per year. Until remarriage a person sixty (60) years or older once qualified through marriage remains eligible individually for single person benefits, subject to income limitations, after the death of his spouse;

Qualified residents shall apply to the department, or its designee, in the county of their residence, on or before the last working day in August of each year for a refund of exempted sales and use taxes, certifying age, residency, disability, if any, marital status, assets and income under oath on forms prescribed by the department. Each application shall be submitted under oath by the applicant and shall be accompanied by a copy of the applicant’s federal income tax return for the previous calendar year or a statement under oath that the applicant was not required to file a return for the previous calendar year. The department shall issue upon request to each qualified applicant a receipt acknowledging the filing of a completed application;

Warrants for tax refunds shall be mailed by the department to qualified recipients by December 20 following the application date of the last working day in August. The department shall enclose a letter of transmittal with each warrant explaining how the refund was computed on the basis of the applicant’s income, enclosing a chart which shows sources of income to the state general fund and an explanation indicating that each payment represents an allowance for sales and use tax refund, property tax refund and a refund for utility or energy costs;

Warrants are issued to senior citizens and disabled persons as a refund and partial exemption of taxes paid under the sales and use taxes, property tax relief and utility or energy cost relief. Refunds are payable from the general fund;

The department of health shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this subsection;

No applicant is entitled to a refund under this subsection unless the person has total household assets as defined by the department of health through rules and regulations of not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) per adult member of the household as adjusted annually by the state average Wyoming cost-of-living index published by the economic analysis division of the department of administration and information. In determining assets, the following property is exempt:

The structure and lands occupied as the applicant’s primary residence;

Household furnishings and personal belongings;

One (1) personal motor vehicle per adult in the household;

Assets held under a bona fide pension plan or individual retirement account (IRA);

The cash value of any life insurance policies held.

Any refund provided by this subsection shall be reduced by the dollar amount received by the applicant for the preceding calendar year from any exemption under W.S.

39-13-105

, any homeowner’s tax credit under W.S. 39-13-109(d)(i) or any tax refund under W.S. 39-13-109(c)(v). Refunds provided by this subsection shall be calculated and may be reduced based upon legislative appropriation for the program in accordance with the following:

The department shall multiply the amount authorized under paragraph (ii) of this subsection by a fraction, the numerator of which for odd numbered fiscal years is equal to one-half (1/2) of the legislative appropriation for the biennial budget period and for even numbered fiscal years is equal to the remaining legislative appropriation for the program for the biennial budget period, and the denominator of which is equal to the total refunds to qualifying recipients under this subsection for the current fiscal year. In no event shall the refund be greater than the amounts specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection.

Credits. There are no specific applicable provisions for credits for this chapter.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this chapter.

Escrow. The following shall apply:

If taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization or any court of competent jurisdiction, the state treasurer shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in a separate interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered by the state board of equalization or the court. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the state treasurer shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the state an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided by law;

“Taxes” for purposes of this provision include any taxes imposed under this act which are paid to the state but shall not include any tax paid pursuant to W.S.

39-13-111

;

This provision does not enlarge or curtail the ability of a taxpayer to appeal any department of revenue decision as otherwise provided for under this act including W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c) or 39-15-109(b).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 112, § 1; 2006, ch. 80, § 1; 2008, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 48, § 1, ch. 169, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2011, ch. 127, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2013 ch. 176, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 20, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2006 amendment,

rewrote (c), inserting the second sentence in (c)(ii) and changing dollar amounts in (ii) and (vii).

Laws 2006, ch. 80, § 3, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (c)(ii) to revise dollar amounts, repealed (c)(i)(B) which defined “equity value,” repealed (c)(i)(E) which defined “resource,” added (c)(vii)(D), (E), and (viii).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by
Laws 2009, ch. 48, § 1, added (b)(iv).

Laws 2009, ch. 48, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.

The second 2009 amendment, by
Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 1, substituted “W.S. 39-13-109(c)(iv)” for “W.S. 39-13-109(c)(iii)” in (c)(viii).

Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 5(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2009.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b)(iv), added the last sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 127 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “W.S. 39-13-109(c)(iv)” for “W.S. 39-13-109(c)(iii)” in (c)(ii).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (c)(ii) inserted “Subject to legislative appropriation for the program,”
preceding “qualified single person”; in (c)(viii) added the last sentence and added (c)(iii)(A).

The 2015 amendment

substituted “39-13-109(c)(v)” for “39-13-109(c)(iv)” in (c)(ii) and the introductory language of (c)(viii).

Laws 2015, ch. 20, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 176, § 3,
directs: “This act shall be given precedence and shall
prevail over
any other act enacted into law during the same session
in which this
act is enacted to the extent that any other act is
in conflict with
amendments made by this act.”

There is no subparagraph (c)(viii)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 80, § 2, provides: “There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for purposes of this act, seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00). Notwithstanding W.S. 9 4 207 funds appropriated under this section shall not revert on June 30, 2006, but shall remain available for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2006.”

Laws 2008, ch. 110, § 3, provides: “Two million three hundred thousand dollars ($2,300,000.00) of the funds appropriated by 2004 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 121, Section 4, shall not revert and are hereby reappropriated to the department of health for the purposes of this act.
Of this appropriation, up to eighty thousand dollars ($80,000.00) may be used to administer the provision of this act.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010.
This appropriation shall be included in the department's standard budget for the 2011-2012 biennium.”

Prevailing clause. —

Laws 2013, ch. 176, § 2, directs: “This act shall be given precedence and shall prevail over any other act enacted into law during the same session in which this act is enacted to the extent that any other act is in conflict with amendments made by this act.”

Statute not to be applied retroactively. —

Where the Wyoming Department of Revenue (DOR) changed the allocation of a company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 39-13-103(b)(xv), 39-14-107(a)(iii), 39-14-207(a)(iv), 39-14-307(a)(iii), 39-14-407(a)(iii), 39-14-507(a)(iii), 39-14-607(a)(iii), and 39-14-707(a)(iii) did not apply retroactively because there was substantial evidence that the events triggering the dispute in this case occurred prior to the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. § 39-2-201(j) in that the production, the discovery of the mis-allocation and the notice of the mis-allocation all occurred prior to the enactment and effective date of § 39-2-201(j). BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Board may not usurp valuation function assigned to department. —

In reviewing final decision of department of revenue, board of equalization erred where it departed from its adjudicatory role and assumed function of prescribing system of establishing fair market value, which was statutorily assigned to department. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 12 P.3d 668,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2000).

Board of equalization not a proper party to appeal from its own order. —

Board of equalization functions in its adjudicatory capacity when it considers appeal from final decision of department of revenue, and when board acts in its adjudicatory capacity, it is not a proper party to an appeal from its own order. Antelope Valley Improvement & Serv. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 4 P.3d 876,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2000).

Property located in multiple jurisdictions. —

The specific provision of § 39-11-109(b)(ii), which addresses tax appeals from the board of equalization, controls over the general administrative appeals provision of § 16-3-114(a) and, therefore, proper filing of appeals from the board of equalization should be made to the district court of the county in which the property, or some part thereof, is located; there is no need for duplicative filings when property is located in multiple jurisdictions, and one jurisdiction will provide adequate access for judicial review. State v. Buggy Bath Unlimited, Inc., 2001 WY 27, 18 P.3d 1182,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 39-11-110.
Statute of limitations.

There are no specific applicable provisions for a statute of limitations for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-11-111.
Distribution.

All revenue received and collected by the department shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall credit the proper accounts.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.